Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4727.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.43, subdivision 5a, is amended to read: Subd. 5a. Limitation on disclosure of certain personnel data. new text begin (a) new text end Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the following data relating to employees of a secure treatment facility defined in section 253B.02, subdivision 18a, new text begin or section 253D.02, subdivision 13; new text end employees of a state correctional facilitydeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end or employees of the Department of Corrections directly involved in supervision of offenders in the community, shall not be disclosed to facility patientsnew text begin or clientsnew text end , corrections inmates, or other individuals who facility or correction administrators reasonably believe will use the information to harass, intimidate, or assault any of these employees: new text begin (1)new text end place where previous education or training occurred; new text begin (2)new text end place of prior employment; deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin (3)new text end payroll timesheets or other comparable data, to the extent that disclosure of payroll timesheets or other comparable data may disclose future work assignments, home address or telephone number, the location of an employee during nonwork hours, or the location of an employee's immediate family membersdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (4) for employees of a secure treatment facility, the final disposition of any disciplinary action together with the specific reasons for the action and data documenting the basis of the action under subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (5). new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding section 13.05, subdivision 12, a government entity that receives a request for personnel data that may be subject to paragraph (a) is authorized to require the requesting person to identify themselves and state a reason for their request. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end